Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB866.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 387.620 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A partially disabled or disabled person, his or her limited guardian, guardian,
limited conservator, [or ]conservator, or any other interested person may petition
the court for:
(a) Termination or modification of an order of partial disability or disability;
(b) Removal, [and/or ]replacement, or removal and replacement of a limited
guardian, guardian, limited conservator, or conservator; or
(c) Renewal of the appointment of a limited guardian, guardian, limited
conservator, or conservator.
(2) Petitions pursuant to this section shall set forth:
(a) The name and address of the ward;
(b) The name and address of the limited guardian, guardian, limited conservator,
or conservator;
(c) The name, address, and interest of the petitioner;
(d) The names and addresses of the ward's next of kin, if known;
(e) The name and address of the individual or facility, if any, having custody of
the ward;
(f) The relief requested; and
(g) The facts and reasons supporting the request.
(3) A request under subsection (1) of this section, if made by the ward, may be
communicated to the court by any means, including[,] but not limited to[,] oral
communication or informal letter. If [such ]a request under subsection (1) of this
section is communicated by means other than a petition, the court shall appoint a
suitable person who may[,] but need not be[,] an employee of the state, county, or
court to prepare a written petition to be filed with the court within seven (7) days
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 3/3/2026 12:58 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1973
following the appointment.
(4) Within thirty (30) days after the filing of a petition, the court shall conduct a
hearing at which the ward shall be entitled to counsel. The time for a hearing may
be extended by the court[,] on motion of either party[,] for cause. Notice of the time
and place of the hearing shall be given by the clerk of the court not less than
fourteen (14) days prior to the hearing to both parties and all persons named in the
petition. The petitioner shall, upon his or her motion, be entitled to have the motion
for termination or modification determined by a jury.
(5) At the request of any party or on its own initiative, the court may order an
interdisciplinary evaluation of the ward. The time period in which the court must
review a petition may be extended for an appropriate period of time if an evaluation
is ordered by the court. The interdisciplinary evaluation report may be filed as a
single or joint report of the interdisciplinary evaluation team, or it may otherwise be
constituted by the separate reports filed by each individual of the team. If the court
and all parties to the proceeding and their attorneys agree to the admissibility of the
report or reports, the report or reports shall be admitted into evidence and shall be
considered by the court.
(6) Upon conclusion of a modification hearing without a jury, the court shall enter a
written order setting forth the factual basis for its finding and may do any of the
following:
(a) Dismiss the petition;
(b) Remove the guardian or conservator and dissolve the guardianship or
conservatorship order;
(c) Remove the limited guardian, guardian, limited conservator, or conservator
and appoint a successor;
(d) Modify the original guardianship or conservatorship order; or
(e) Make any other order which the court deems appropriate and in the best
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 3/3/2026 12:58 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1973
interest of the ward.
(7) If the original order is dissolved and no further order is issued, the ward shall be
relieved of all legal disabilities. The court shall enter an order and judgment
restoring to the person all of the rights and privileges of a citizen. The clerk shall
note the judgment or modification in the book in which notices of actions and
encumbrances are indexed.
(8) The clerk of the court shall transmit a certified copy of the restoration judgment or
modification to the originating court[,] if the judgment or modification is ordered
by a court other than the court in which the original judgment was entered.
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 3/3/2026 12:58 PM Jacketed